Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-404
Fraudulent discharge; deserters; trial by court-martial.

(1) All persons discharged from the military forces of Nebraska subsequently charged with having fraudulently obtained such discharge shall, subject to the provisions of section 55-426, be subject to trial by court-martial on such charge and shall after apprehension be subject to this code while in the custody of the military forces for such trial. Upon conviction of such charge they shall be subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this code committed prior to the fraudulent discharge.

(2) Any person who has deserted from the military forces shall not be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this code by virtue of a separation from any subsequent period of service.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 4, p. 1554.